files/root/usr/local/lib/english.aff
# side will be applied only if the conditions in the replacement are
# satisfied.  The conditions also implicitly define a length;  roots
# shorter than the number of conditions will not pass the test.  (As a
# special case, a condition of a single dot "." defines a length of zero,
# so that the rule applies to all words indiscriminately).
#
# Conditions that are single characters should be separated by white space.
#
# An example from below:
#
# flag *S:
#    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IES		# As in imply > implies
#    [AEIOU]Y	>	S		# As in convey > conveys
#    [SXZH]	>	ES		# As in fix > fixes
#    [^SXZHY]	>	S		# As in bat > bats
#
# The first line applies to words ending in Y, but not in vowel-Y.  The
# second takes care of the vowel-Y words.  The third then handles those
# words that end in a sibilant or near-sibilant, and the last picks up
# everything else.
#
# Note that the conditions are written very carefully so that they apply
# to disjoint sets of words.  In particular, note that the fourth line
# excludes words ending in Y as well as the obvious SXZH.  Otherwise, it
# would convert "imply" into "implys".
#
# Although we do not do so in this file, we could also have a flag
# generate more than one variation on a root word.  For example, we
# could extend the "R" flag as follows:
#
# flag *R:
#    E		>	R		# As in skate > skater
#    E		>	RS		# As in skate > skaters
#    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IER		# As in multiply > multiplier
#    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IERS		# As in multiply > multipliers
#    [AEIOU]Y	>	ER		# As in convey > conveyer
#    [AEIOU]Y	>	ERS		# As in convey > conveyers
#    [^EY]	>	ER		# As in build > builder
#    [^EY]	>	ERS		# As in build > builders
#
# This flag would generate both "skater" and "skaters" from "skate".  This
# capability can be very useful in language that make use of noun, verb,
# and adjective endings.  For instance, one could define a single flag
# that generated all of the German "weak" verb endings.
#

nroffchars	().\\*
texchars	()\[]{}<\>\\$*.%

#	And now to the English table itself

# First we declare the character set.  Since it's English, it's easy.
# The only special character is the apostrophe, so that possessives can
# be handled.  We declare it as a boundary character, so that quoting with
# single quotes doesn't confuse things.  The apostrophe is the only
# character that gets such treatment.
#
# We declare the apostrophe first so that "Jon's" collates before "Jonas".
# (This is the way ASCII does it).
#

boundarychars '
wordchars [a-z] [A-Z]

# Here's a record of flags used, in case you want to add new ones.
# Right now, we fit within the minimal MASKBITS definition.
#
#            ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
# Used:      *  *  ****  ** * ***** ***
#            A  D  GHIJ  MN P RSTUV XYZ
# Available:  -- --    --  - -     -
#             BC EF    KL  O Q     W

# Now the prefix table.  There are only three prefixes that are truly
# frequent in English, and none of them seem to need conditional variations.
#
prefixes

flag *A:
    .		>	RE		# As in enter > reenter

flag *I:
    .		>	IN		# As in disposed > indisposed

flag *U:
    .		>	UN		# As in natural > unnatural

# Finally, the suffixes.  These are exactly the suffixes that came out
# with the original "ispell";  I haven't tried to improve them.  The only
# thing I did besides translate them was to add selected cross-product flags.
#
suffixes

flag V:
    E		>	-E,IVE		# As in create > creative
    [^E]	>	IVE		# As in prevent > preventive

flag *N:
    E		>	-E,ION		# As in create > creation
    Y		>	-Y,ICATION	# As in multiply > multiplication
    [^EY]	>	EN		# As in fall > fallen

flag *X:
    E		>	-E,IONS		# As in create > creations
    Y		>	-Y,ICATIONS	# As in multiply > multiplications
    [^EY]	>	ENS		# As in weak > weakens

flag H:
    Y		>	-Y,IETH		# As in twenty > twentieth
    [^Y]	>	TH		# As in hundred > hundredth

flag *Y:
    .		>	LY		# As in quick > quickly

flag *G:
    E		>	-E,ING		# As in file > filing
    [^E]	>	ING		# As in cross > crossing

flag *J:
    E		>	-E,INGS		# As in file > filings
    [^E]	>	INGS		# As in cross > crossings

flag *D:
    E		>	D		# As in create > created
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IED		# As in imply > implied
    [^EY]	>	ED		# As in cross > crossed
    [AEIOU]Y	>	ED		# As in convey > conveyed

flag T:
    E		>	ST		# As in late > latest
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IEST		# As in dirty > dirtiest
    [AEIOU]Y	>	EST		# As in gray > grayest
    [^EY]	>	EST		# As in small > smallest

flag *R:
    E		>	R		# As in skate > skater
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IER		# As in multiply > multiplier
    [AEIOU]Y	>	ER		# As in convey > conveyer
    [^EY]	>	ER		# As in build > builder

flag *Z:
    E		>	RS		# As in skate > skaters
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IERS		# As in multiply > multipliers
    [AEIOU]Y	>	ERS		# As in convey > conveyers
    [^EY]	>	ERS		# As in build > builders

flag *S:
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IES		# As in imply > implies
    [AEIOU]Y	>	S		# As in convey > conveys
    [SXZH]	>	ES		# As in fix > fixes
    [^SXZHY]	>	S		# As in bat > bats

flag *P:
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,INESS	# As in cloudy > cloudiness
    [AEIOU]Y	>	NESS		# As in gray > grayness
    [^Y]	>	NESS		# As in late > lateness

flag *M:
    .		>	'S		# As in dog > dog's
   
